Florida, session 2026, SB1458.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âArtificial Intelligence in Higher Education 13 Study Group.â 14 (1)âCREATION.âThere is created the Artificial Intelligence 15 in Higher Education Study Group to review and make 16 recommendations on the opportunities and risks presented by, and 17 best practices for managing, artificial intelligence in academic 18 instruction, research, and student conduct within the State 19 University System and Florida College System. 20 (2)âMEMBERSHIP.âThe study group shall consist of all of the 21 following: 22 (a)âFaculty members appointed by the presidents of state 23 universities and Florida College System institutions, 24 representing a mix of disciplines, including humanities, 25 sciences, and professional programs. 26 (b)âRepresentatives from the Board of Governors and the 27 State Board of Education. 28 (c)âAt least one expert in artificial intelligence, 29 computer science, or data ethics. 30 (d)âAt least one representative from the Southern Regional 31 Education Board. 32 (e)âA representative from the Division of Florida Colleges 33 within the Department of Education. 34 (f)âOne student representative, who must be the student 35 member serving on the Board of Governors pursuant to s. 1004.70, 36 Florida Statutes, or the student member serving on the State 37 Board of Education pursuant to s. 1001.71, Florida Statutes. 38 (3)âDUTIES.âThe study group shall do all of the following: 39 (a)âExamine the impact of artificial intelligence on 40 academic integrity, including plagiarism, contract cheating, and 41 verification of student work. 42 (b)âReview potential applications of artificial 43 intelligence in teaching, learning support, advising, grading, 44 accessibility, and research. 45 (c)âAssess implications for privacy, intellectual property, 46 and data security when artificial intelligence tools are used by 47 faculty and students. 48 (d)âConsider safeguards to protect academic freedom while 49 maintaining clear expectations for student conduct. 50 (e)âIdentify professional development, resource, and 51 training needs for faculty and staff to address the responsible 52 use of artificial intelligence in the classroom. 53 (f)âReview national and international best practices in 54 higher education regarding artificial intelligence governance 55 and adoption. 56 (g)âRecommend model policies for institutions to adopt 57 regarding the ethical and effective use of artificial 58 intelligence. 59 (4)âSTAKEHOLDER INPUT.âThe study group shall solicit input 60 from faculty senates, student governments, accrediting bodies, 61 and industry representatives with expertise in artificial 62 intelligence and workforce development. 63 (5)âREPORT.âBy December 1, 2026, the study group shall 64 submit a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 65 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives with findings 66 and recommendations, including model policies and any proposed 67 legislation. 68 (6)âEXPIRATION.âThis section expires December 31, 2026. 69 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.